Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4844
Distribution of assets.

Under the direction of the court, the liquidator shall pay distributions in a manner that will assure the proper recognition of priorities and a reasonable balance between the expeditious completion of the liquidation and the protection of unliquidated and undetermined claims, including third-party claims. Distribution of assets in kind may be made at valuations set by agreement between the liquidator and the creditor and approved by the court.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 44.